apertium-sv-da/apertium-sv-da.da.dix
    <pardef n="mild__adj">
       <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>t</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="ea"/><s n="pl"/><s n="indef"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="ea"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ere</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>st</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="absolut/__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="ea"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>te</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="ea"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>te</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="ea"/><s n="pl"/><s n="indef"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="aktiv__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>t</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="ea"/><s n="pl"/><s n="indef"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="ea"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="lykkelig__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>t</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="ea"/><s n="pl"/><s n="indef"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="ea"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ere</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>st</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    
    <pardef n="amerikansk__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="ea"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="ea"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="ea"/><s n="pl"/><s n="indef"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="grusom__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>t</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>me</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="ea"/><s n="pl"/><s n="indef"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mere</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>st</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="modsat__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>te</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="grimme__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ste</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="l/ang__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ængere</l>
          <r>ang<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>anges</l>
          <r>ang<s n="adj"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ang</l>
          <r>ang<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>angt</l>
          <r>ang<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ange</l>
          <r>ang<s n="adj"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="besked/en__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r>en<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ent</l>
          <r>en<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ne</l>
          <r>en<s n="adj"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="rust/en__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r>en<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ne</l>
          <r>en<s n="adj"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="munt/er__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>er</l>
          <r>er<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>re</l>
          <r>er<s n="adj"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/gammel__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ældre</l>
          <r>gammel<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gamles</l>
          <r>gammel<s n="adj"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gammelt</l>
          <r>gammel<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gammel</l>
          <r>gammel<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gamle</l>
          <r>gammel<s n="adj"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ældste</l>
          <r>gammel<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/god__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>bedre</l>
          <r>god<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>godt</l>
          <r>god<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>god</l>
          <r>god<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gode</l>
          <r>god<s n="adj"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>bedste</l>
          <r>god<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>bedst</l>
          <r>god<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

      <e>
        <i>besked</i>
        <par n="besked/en__adj"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>blind</i>
        <par n="aktiv__adj"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>blonde</l>
          <r>blond</r>
        </p>
        <par n="amerikansk__adj"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>brun</i>
        <par n="absolut/__adj"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>dyb</i>
        <par n="mild__adj"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>dyr</i>
        <par n="mild__adj"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>elektrisk</i>
        <par n="amerikansk__adj"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>eneste</i>
        <par n="absolut/__adj"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>flad</i>
        <par n="mild__adj"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>fornuftig</i>
        <par n="lykkelig__adj"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>forskellig</i>
        <par n="aktiv__adj"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>fransk</i>
        <par n="amerikansk__adj"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>fuld</i>
        <par n="lykkelig__adj"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <par n="/gammel__adj"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>generel</i>
        <par n="lykkelig__adj"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <par n="/god__adj"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>grimme</l>
          <r>grim</r>
        </p>
        <par n="grimme__adj"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>grusom</i>
        <par n="grusom__adj"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>hollandsk</i>
        <par n="amerikansk__adj"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>hvid</i>
        <par n="aktiv__adj"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>kold</i>
        <par n="mild__adj"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>l</i>
        <par n="l/ang__adj"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>latterlig</i>
        <par n="absolut/__adj"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>lav</i>
        <par n="mild__adj"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>lig</i>
        <par n="amerikansk__adj"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>livligt</l>
          <r>livlig</r>
        </p>
        <par n="absolut/__adj"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>lykkelig</i>
        <par n="lykkelig__adj"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>modsat</i>
        <par n="modsat__adj"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>mulig</i>
        <par n="aktiv__adj"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>munt</i>
        <par n="munt/er__adj"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>norsk</i>
        <par n="amerikansk__adj"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>ny</i>
        <par n="mild__adj"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>nysgerrig</i>
        <par n="lykkelig__adj"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>offensiv</i>
        <par n="absolut/__adj"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>offentlig</i>
        <par n="aktiv__adj"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>rig</i>
        <par n="mild__adj"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>rund</i>
        <par n="absolut/__adj"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>rust</i>
        <par n="rust/en__adj"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>sandsynlig</i>
        <par n="aktiv__adj"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>skeptiske</l>
          <r>skeptisk</r>
        </p>
        <par n="amerikansk__adj"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>sur</i>
        <par n="lykkelig__adj"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>svag</i>
        <par n="aktiv__adj"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>syg</i>
        <par n="amerikansk__adj"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>tung</i>
        <par n="mild__adj"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>tydelig</i>
        <par n="lykkelig__adj"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>typisk</i>
        <par n="absolut/__adj"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>vanskelig</i>
        <par n="aktiv__adj"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>videnskabelig</i>
        <par n="lykkelig__adj"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>virkeligt</l>
          <r>virkelig</r>
        </p>
        <par n="absolut/__adj"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>voks</i>
        <par n="besked/en__adj"/>
      </e>
